en: Bassoon keywork material: Gold-plated; Nickel-plated; Nickel-silver; Silver-plated; Stainless steel; Unplated (raw nickel-silver); Other
ko: 바순 키워크 소재: 금 도금; 니켈 도금; 니켈 실버; 은 도금; 스테인리스 스틸; 무도금(원시 니켈 실버); 기타
hu: Fagott billentyűzetének anyaga: Aranyozott; Nikkelezett; Újezüst; Ezüstözött; Rozsdamentes acél; Bevonat nélküli (nyers újezüst); Egyéb
hr-HR: Materijal ključa za fagot: Pozlaćeno; Poniklano; Novo srebro; Posrebreno; Nehrđajući čelik; Bez premaza (sirovo novo srebro); Ostalo
cs: Materiál klapek fagotu: Pozlacené; Poniklované; Alpaka; Postříbřené; Nerezová ocel; Bez povrchové úpravy (surová alpaka); Jiné
zh-TW: 低音管按鍵系統材質: 鍍金; 鍍鎳; 鎳銀合金; 鍍銀; 不鏽鋼; 未鍍層 (原鎳銀); 其他
nb: Materiale i mekanismer i fagott: Forgylt; Forniklet; Nysølv; Forsølvet; Rustfritt stål; Ubelagt (rå nysølv); Annet
sk-SK: Materiál klapiek na fagote: Pozlátené; Poniklované; Alpaka; Postriebrené; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Nepokovované (surová alpaka); Iné
nl: Klepwerkmateriaal fagot: Verguld; Vernikkeld; Nieuwzilver; Verzilverd; Roestvrij staal; Ongeplateerd (ruw nieuwzilver); Overig
da: Materiale i fagottens klaviatur: Forgyldt; Forniklet; Nysølv; Forsølvet; Rustfrit stål; Ubelagt (rå nysølv); Andet
ja: ファゴットキーワーク素材: 金メッキ; ニッケルメッキ; 洋白 (ニッケルシルバー); 銀メッキ; ステンレス鋼; メッキなし (生洋白); その他
pl: Materiał klawiszy fagotu: Pozłacany; Niklowany; Nowe srebro; Posrebrzany; Stal nierdzewna; Niepowlekany (surowe nowe srebro); Inny
ru: Материал механики фагота: Позолоченный; Никелированный; Нейзильбер; Посеребренный; Нержавеющая сталь; Без покрытия (необработанный нейзильбер); Другое
bg-BG: Материал за ключовете на фагот: Позлатен; Поникелиран; Алпака; Посребрен; Неръждаема стомана; Без покритие (сурова алпака); Друго
es: Material de las llaves del fagot: Chapado en oro; Niquelado; Alpaca; Plateado; Acero inoxidable; Sin baño (alpaca cruda); Otro
vi: Chất liệu hệ thống phím kèn Bassoon: Mạ vàng; Mạ niken; Bạc-niken; Mạ bạc; Thép không gỉ; Không mạ (bạc-niken thô); Khác
tr: Fagot tuş mekanizması malzemesi: Altın kaplama; Nikel kaplama; Nikel gümüş; Gümüş kaplama; Paslanmaz çelik; Kaplamasız (ham nikel gümüş); Diğer
it: Materiale della meccanica del fagotto: Placcato oro; Nichelato; Alpacca; Argentato; Acciaio inossidabile; Non placcato (alpacca grezza); Altro
ro-RO: Materialul mecanismului de clape al fagotului: Placat cu aur; Placat cu nichel; Alpaca (nichel-argint); Placat cu argint; Oțel inoxidabil; Neplacat (alpaca brută); Altele
fr: Matériau des clés du basson: Plaqué or; Plaqué nickel; Maillechort; Plaqué argent; Acier inoxydable; Non plaqué (maillechort brut); Autre
sv: Tangentmaterial till fagott: Förgylld; Förnicklad; Nysilver; Försilvrad; Rostfritt stål; Opläterad (rått nysilver); Övrigt
fi: Fagotin koskettimien materiaali: Kullattu; Nikkelöity; Uushopea; Hopeoitu; Ruostumaton teräs; Pinnoittamaton (raaka uushopea); Muu
pt-PT: Material das chaves do fagote: Banhado a ouro; Niquelado; Alpaca; Prateado; Aço inoxidável; Sem revestimento (alpaca em bruto); Outro
pt-BR: Material das chaves do fagote: Banhado a ouro; Niquelado; Alpaca; Banhado a prata; Aço inoxidável; Sem banho (alpaca bruta); Outros
sl-SI: Material za tipke fagota: Pozlačeno; Ponikljano; Novo srebro; Posrebreno; Nerjavno jeklo; Brez prevleke (surovo novo srebro); Drugo
th: วัสดุกลไกคีย์ของบาสซูน: ชุบทอง; ชุบนิกเกิล; นิกเกิลซิลเวอร์; ชุบเงิน; สเตนเลสสตีล; ไม่ชุบ (นิกเกิลซิลเวอร์ดิบ); อื่นๆ
de: Material der Fagottmechanik: Vergoldet; Vernickelt; Neusilber; Versilbert; Edelstahl; Unbeschichtet (rohes Neusilber); Sonstige
zh-CN: 巴松管按键材质: 镀金; 镀镍; 白铜; 镀银; 不锈钢; 未电镀（原色白铜）; 其他
lt-LT: Fagoto klavišų mechanizmo medžiaga: Padengtas auksu; Nikeliuotas; Melchioras; Padengtas sidabru; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Nepadengtas (grynas melchioras); Kita
el: Υλικό μηχανισμού κλειδιών του φαγκότου: Επίχρυσο; Επινικελωμένο; Αλπακάς; Επάργυρο; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Χωρίς επίστρωση (ακατέργαστος αλπακάς); Άλλο